Florida, session 2026, SB476.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âThis act may be referred to as the âTechnical 27 Trademark Amendments Act of 2026.â 28 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 495.111, Florida 29 Statutes, is amended to read: 30 495.111âClassification.â 31 (1)âThe department shall, no later than July 1 of every 32 year, adopt the United States Patent and Trademark Officeâs 33 system of classification of goods and services in effect on June 34 1 of that year as the Florida classification system. The 35 classification must be published as part of the trademark 36 registration form following general classes of goods and 37 services, conforming to the classification adopted by the United 38 States Patent and Trademark Office, are established for 39 convenience of administration of this chapter: 40 (a)âGoods: 41 1.âClass 1âChemicals for use in industry, science and 42 photography, as well as in agriculture, horticulture and 43 forestry; unprocessed artificial resins, unprocessed plastics; 44 fire extinguishing and fire prevention compositions; tempering 45 and soldering preparations; substances for tanning animal skins 46 and hides; adhesives for use in industry; putties and other 47 paste fillers; compost, manures, fertilizers; biological 48 preparations for use in industry and science. 49 2.âClass 2âPaints, varnishes, lacquers; preservatives 50 against rust and against deterioration of wood; colorants, dyes; 51 inks for printing, marking and engraving; raw natural resins; 52 metals in foil and powder form for use in painting, decorating, 53 printing and art. 54 3.âClass 3âNon-medicated cosmetics and toiletry 55 preparations; non-medicated dentifrices; perfumery, essential 56 oils; bleaching preparations and other substances for laundry 57 use; cleaning, polishing, scouring and abrasive preparations. 58 4.âClass 4âIndustrial oils and greases, wax; lubricants; 59 dust absorbing, wetting and binding compositions; fuels and 60 illuminants; candles and wicks for lighting. 61 5.âClass 5âPharmaceuticals, medical and veterinary 62 preparations; sanitary preparations for medical purposes; 63 dietetic food and substances adapted for medical or veterinary 64 use, food for babies; dietary supplements for humans and 65 animals; plasters, materials for dressings; material for 66 stopping teeth, dental wax; disinfectants; preparations for 67 destroying vermin; fungicides, herbicides. 68 6.âClass 6âCommon metals and their alloys, ores; metal 69 materials for building and construction; transportable buildings 70 of metal; non-electric cables and wires of common metal; small 71 items of metal hardware; metal containers for storage or 72 transport; safes. 73 7.âClass 7âMachines, machine tools, power-operated tools; 74 motors and engines, except for land vehicles; machine coupling 75 and transmission components, except for land vehicles; 76 agricultural implements, other than hand-operated hand tools; 77 incubators for eggs; automatic vending machines. 78 8.âClass 8âHand tools and implements, hand-operated; 79 cutlery; side arms, except firearms; razors. 80 9.âClass 9âScientific, nautical, surveying, photographic, 81 cinematographic, optical, weighing, measuring, signaling, 82 checking (supervision), life-saving and teaching apparatus and 83 instruments; apparatus and instruments for conducting, 84 switching, transforming, accumulating, regulating or controlling 85 electricity; apparatus for recording, transmission or 86 reproduction of sound or images; magnetic data carriers, 87 recording discs; compact discs, DVDs and other digital recording 88 media; mechanisms for coin-operated apparatus; cash registers, 89 calculating machines, data processing equipment, computers; 90 computer software; fire-extinguishing apparatus. 91 10.âClass 10âSurgical, medical, dental and veterinary 92 apparatus and instruments; artificial limbs, eyes and teeth; 93 orthopaedic articles; suture materials; therapeutic and 94 assistive devices adapted for the disabled; massage apparatus; 95 apparatus, devices and articles for nursing infants; sexual 96 activity apparatus, devices and articles. 97 11.âClass 11âApparatus for lighting, heating, steam 98 generating, cooking, refrigerating, drying, ventilating, water 99 supply and sanitary purposes. 100 12.âClass 12âVehicles; apparatus for locomotion by land, 101 air or water. 102 13.âClass 13âFirearms; ammunition and projectiles; 103 explosives; fireworks. 104 14.âClass 14âPrecious metals and their alloys; jewellery, 105 precious and semi-precious stones; horological and chronometric 106 instruments. 107 15.âClass 15âMusical instruments. 108 16.âClass 16âPaper and cardboard; printed matter; 109 bookbinding material; photographs; stationery and office 110 requisites, except furniture; adhesives for stationery or 111 household purposes; drawing materials and materials for artists; 112 paintbrushes; instructional and teaching materials; plastic 113 sheets, films and bags for wrapping and packaging; printersâ 114 type, printing blocks. 115 17.âClass 17âUnprocessed and semi-processed rubber, gutta 116 percha, gum, asbestos, mica and substitutes for all these 117 materials; plastics and resins in extruded form for use in 118 manufacture; packing, stopping and insulating materials; 119 flexible pipes, tubes and hoses, not of metal. 120 18.âClass 18âLeather and imitations of leather; animal 121 skins and hides; luggage and carrying bags; umbrellas and 122 parasols; walking sticks; whips, harness and saddlery; collars, 123 leashes and clothing for animals. 124 19.âClass 19âBuilding materials (non-metallic); non 125 metallic rigid pipes for building; asphalt, pitch and bitumen; 126 non-metallic transportable buildings; monuments, not of metal. 127 20.âClass 20âFurniture, mirrors, picture frames; 128 containers, not of metal, for storage or transport; unworked or 129 semi-worked bone, horn, whalebone or mother-of-pearl; shells; 130 meerschaum; yellow amber. 131 21.âClass 21âHousehold or kitchen utensils and containers; 132 cookware and tableware, except forks, knives and spoons; combs 133 and sponges; brushes, except paintbrushes; brush-making 134 materials; articles for cleaning purposes; unworked or semi 135 worked glass, except building glass; glassware, porcelain and 136 earthenware. 137 22.âClass 22âRopes and string; nets; tents and tarpaulins; 138 awnings of textile or synthetic materials; sails; sacks for the 139 transport and storage of materials in bulk; padding, cushioning 140 and stuffing materials,except of paper, cardboard, rubber or 141 plastics; raw fibrous textile materials and substitutes 142 therefor. 143 23.âClass 23âYarns and threads, for textile use. 144 24.âClass 24âTextiles and substitutes for textiles; 145 household linen; curtains of textile or plastic. 146 25.âClass 25âClothing, footwear, headgear. 147 26.âClass 26âLace and embroidery, ribbons and braid; 148 buttons, hooks and eyes, pins and needles; artificial flowers; 149 hair decorations; false hair. 150 27.âClass 27âCarpets, rugs, mats and matting, linoleum and 151 other materials for covering existing floors; wall hangings 152 (non-textile). 153 28.âClass 28âGames, toys and playthings; video game 154 apparatus; gymnastic and sporting articles; decorations for 155 Christmas trees. 156 29.âClass 29âMeat, fish, poultry and game; meat extracts; 157 preserved, frozen, dried and cooked fruits and vegetables; 158 jellies, jams, compotes; eggs; milk and milk products; oils and 159 fats for food. 160 30.âClass 30âCoffee, tea, cocoa and artificial coffee; 161 rice; tapioca and sago; flour and preparations made from 162 cereals; bread, pastries and confectionery; edible ices; sugar, 163 honey, treacle; yeast, baking-powder; salt; mustard; vinegar, 164 sauces (condiments); spices; ice (frozen water). 165 31.âClass 31âRaw and unprocessed agricultural, 166 aquacultural, horticultural and forestry products; raw and 167 unprocessed grains and seeds; fresh fruits and vegetables, fresh 168 herbs; natural plants and flowers; bulbs, seedlings and seeds 169 for planting; live animals; foodstuffs and beverages for 170 animals; malt. 171 32.âClass 32âBeers; mineral and aerated waters and other 172 non-alcoholic beverages; fruit beverages and fruit juices; 173 syrups and other preparations for making beverages. 174 33.âClass 33âAlcoholic beverages (except beers). 175 34.âClass 34âTobacco; smokersâ articles; matches. 176 (b)âServices: 177 1.âClass 35âAdvertising; business management; business 178 administration; office functions. 179 2.âClass 36âInsurance; financial affairs; monetary 180 affairs; real estate affairs. 181 3.âClass 37âBuilding construction; repair; installation 182 services. 183 4.âClass 38âTelecommunications. 184 5.âClass 39âTransport; packaging and storage of goods; 185 travel arrangement. 186 6.âClass 40âTreatment of materials. 187 7.âClass 41âEducation; providing of training; 188 entertainment; sporting and cultural activities. 189 8.âClass 42âScientific and technological services and 190 research and design relating thereto; industrial analysis and 191 research services; design and development of computer hardware 192 and software. 193 9.âClass 43âServices for providing food and drink; 194 temporary accommodation. 195 10.âClass 44âMedical services; veterinary services; 196 hygienic and beauty care for human beings or animals; 197 agriculture, horticulture and forestry services. 198 11.âClass 45âLegal services; security services for the 199 physical protection of tangible property and individuals; 200 personal and social services rendered by others to meet the 201 needs of individuals. 202 (c)âCertification and collective membership marks: 203 1.âClass 200âCollective membership marks. 204 2.âClass AâCertification marks for goods. 205 3.âClass BâCertification marks for services. 206 (d)âThe goods and services recited in collective trademark 207 and collective service mark applications are assigned to the 208 same classes that are appropriate for those goods and services 209 in general. 210 Section 3.âSection 495.029, Florida Statutes, is created to 211 read: 212 495.029âOnline registration system.âBy July 1, 2027, the 213 department shall establish and maintain a secure online 214 registration system to safeguard an applicantâs information and 215 ensure data integrity. The online registration system must allow 216 an applicant to do all of the following: 217 (1)âSubmit an application in accordance with ss. 495.031 218 and 495.035. 219 (2)âSubmit a renewal application in accordance with s. 220 495.071. 221 (3)âSubmit an electronic version of a required specimen of 222 use. 223 (4)âSubmit an electronic version of a drawing of the mark. 224 (5)âPay the fee required by s. 495.191. 225 (6)âComplete the verification required by s. 495.031(5). 226 Section 4.âSubsections (5) and (6) of section 495.031, 227 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 228 495.031âApplication for registration.â 229 (5)âEvery application under this section must shall be 230 signed and verified by the applicant or by a member of the firm 231 or an officer or other authorized representative of the business 232 entity applying. Verification must be made in accordance with s. 233 92.525. 234 (6)âEvery paper application under this section must shall 235 be accompanied by three specimens or facsimiles showing the mark 236 as actually used. Every electronic application filed pursuant to 237 s. 495.029 must be accompanied by an electronic copy of a 238 specimen showing the mark as actually used. 239 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.